Wisconsin, session 2025, AB484.
do enact as follows:AB484,11Section 1. 175.60 (4) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB484,2,32175.60 (4) (a) (intro.) The Subject to par. (b), the proof of training requirement 3under sub. (7) (e) may be met by any of the following:AB484,24Section 2. 175.60 (4) (a) 1. a. of the statutes is repealed.AB484,35Section 3. 175.60 (4) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB484,2,126175.60 (4) (a) 3. A current or expired license, or a photocopy of a current or 7expired license, that the individual holds or has held that indicates that the 8individual is licensed or has been licensed to carry a firearm in this state or in 9another state or in a county or municipality of this state or of another state unless 10along with proof that, to receive the license, the individual underwent training that 11satisfies the requirements under par. (b). This subdivision does not apply if the 12license has been revoked for cause.AB484,413Section 4. 175.60 (4) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB484,2,1814175.60 (4) (am) The proof of continuing training requirement under sub. (15) 15(b) 3. may be met by a copy of a document, or an affidavit from an instructor or 16organization that conducted the course or program, that indicates the individual 17completed a course or program under par. (a) 1., 2., or 4. after the issuance of the 18license that is being renewed.AB484,519Section 5. 175.60 (4) (b) 2. of the statutes is renumbered 175.60 (4) (b) 2. 20(intro.) and amended to read:AB484,3,41175.60 (4) (b) 2. (intro.) The department may not require firing live 2ammunition A course or program shall contain all of the following to meet the 3training requirements under par. (a). and the continuing training requirements 4under par. (am):AB484,65Section 6. 175.60 (4) (b) 2. a., b., c., d. and e. of the statutes are created to 6read:AB484,3,77175.60 (4) (b) 2. a. Training on and practicing firing live ammunition.AB484,3,98b. Information and instructions on firearms safety and storage, including safe 9storage while traveling and safe storage in a vehicle.AB484,3,1010c. Methods to prevent accidental shootings.AB484,3,1111d. Information on suicide prevention.AB484,3,1212e. Training on de-escalation techniques and strategies.AB484,713Section 7. 175.60 (15) (b) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB484,3,1514175.60 (15) (b) 3. Submits proof of continuing training as described in sub. (4) 15(am).AB484,816Section 8. 175.60 (15) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB484,3,1917175.60 (15) (d) The department shall issue a renewal license by 1st class mail 18within 21 days of receiving a renewal application, statement, and fees all items 19under par. (b).AB484,920Section 9. Initial applicability.AB484,4,221(1) The treatment of s. 175.60 (4) (a) (intro.), 1. a., and 3. and (am) and (15) (b) 223. and (d), the renumbering and amendment of s. 175.60 (4) (b) 2., and the creation 1of s. 175.60 (4) (b) 2. a., b., c., d., and e. first apply to applications for license issuance 2or renewal that are submitted on the effective date of this subsection.AB484,4,33